Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 11.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5726
Public place, defined.

Public place means an indoor area to which the public is invited or in which the public is permitted, whether or not the public is always invited or permitted. A private residence is not a public place.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 11.